Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-533.03
Involvement of parents, guardians, and educational decisionmakers; noncompliance of school district; remedial action.

If the Commissioner of Education determines that any school district has intentionally refused, in a material manner, to comply with sections 79-530 to 79-533.02, the commissioner shall notify the school district of the noncompliance and allow the school district a reasonable time to comply. If the commissioner determines, after such time has elapsed, that the school district is not in compliance and has not made a good faith attempt to comply, the commissioner shall take appropriate remedial action within the commissioner's authority, up to and including qualifying such noncompliance as a violation of the rules and regulations for the accreditation of schools.

Laws 2024, LB71, § 7.
July 19, 2024